Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 329.045 is amended to read:
329.045. (1)(a) In order to achieve the goals contained in ORS 329.025, the State  Board of Edu-
cation  shall  regularly and periodically review and revise its Common Curriculum Goals, performance
indicators and diploma requirements.
(b) The review and revision conducted under this section shall:
(A) Include Essential Learning Skills  and rigorous academic content standards in mathematics,
science, language arts,  history, geography, economics, civics, higher education and career path
skills, personal financial education, physical education, health, the arts and world languages.
(B) Ensure that  any revisions to the academic content standards for science, health,
history, geography, economics and civics include standards that address  the causes and ef-
fects of climate change and strategies for  mitigating, adapting to and strengthening com-
munity resilience to those causes and effects.
[(B)] (C) Involve teachers  and other educators, parents of students and other citizens and shall
provide ample opportunity for public comment.
[(C)] (D) Encourage increased learning time. As used in  this subparagraph, “increased learning
time” means a schedule that encompasses a longer school day, week or year  for the purpose of in-
creasing the total number of school hours available to provide:
(i) Students with  instruction in core academic subjects, including mathematics, science, language
arts, history,  geography, economics, civics, higher education and career path skills, personal finan-
cial education, the arts and world languages;
(ii) Students with instruction in subjects other than  the subjects identified in sub-subparagraph
(i) of this subparagraph, including health and physical education;
(iii) Students with the opportunity to participate in enrichment activities that  contribute to a
well-rounded education, including learning opportunities that may be based on service, experience
or work and that may be provided through partnerships with other organizations; and
(iv) Teachers with the opportunity to  collaborate, plan and engage in professional development
within and across grades and subjects.
(c) Nothing in this subsection prevents a school district  or public charter school from main-
taining control over course content, format, materials and teaching methods.
Enrolled House Bill 3365 (HB 3365-B) Page 1
(2) The State Board of Education shall continually  review and revise all adopted academic
content standards necessary for students to successfully transition to the next  phase of their edu-
cation.
(3)(a) School districts and public charter schools must offer students instruction in mathematics,
science, language arts,  history, geography, economics, civics, higher education and career path
skills, personal financial education, physical education, health, the arts and world languages.
(b) Instruction required under paragraph (a) of this subsection must:
(A) Meet the academic content standards adopted by the State Board of Education; and
(B) Meet  the requirements adopted by the State Board of Education and the board of the school
district or public charter school.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 329.045, as amended by section 1, chapter 202,  Oregon Laws 2019, section 6,
chapter 178, Oregon Laws 2021, section 1, chapter 328, Oregon Laws 2023, and section  7, chapter
564, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
329.045. (1)(a) In order  to achieve the goals contained in ORS 329.025, the State Board of Edu-
cation  shall  regularly and periodically review and revise its Common Curriculum Goals, performance
indicators and diploma requirements.
(b) The review and revision conducted under this section shall:
(A) Include Essential Learning Skills and rigorous academic  content standards in mathematics,
science, language arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education and  career path
skills, personal financial education, physical education, health, the arts and world languages.
(B) Ensure that  the academic content standards for history, geography, economics and civics
include sufficient instruction on the histories, contributions and perspectives of individuals who:
(i) Are Native American;
(ii) Are of African, Asian, Pacific Island, Chicano, Latino, Middle Eastern or Jewish descent;
(iii) Are women;
(iv) Have disabilities;
(v) Are immigrants or refugees; or
(vi) Are lesbian, gay, bisexual or transgender.
(C) Ensure that any revisions to the academic content standards for science, health,
history, geography, economics and civics include standards that address  the causes and ef-
fects of climate change and strategies for  mitigating, adapting to and strengthening com-
munity resilience to those causes and effects.
[(C)] (D) Involve  teachers and other educators, parents of students and other citizens and shall
provide ample opportunity for public comment.
[(D)] (E) Encourage increased learning time. As used in this subparagraph,  “increased learning
time” means a schedule that encompasses a longer school day, week or year  for the purpose of in-
creasing the total number of school hours available to provide:
(i) Students with  instruction in core academic subjects, including mathematics, science, language
arts, history,  geography, economics, civics, higher education and career path skills, personal finan-
cial education, the arts and world languages;
(ii) Students with instruction in subjects other than  the subjects identified in sub-subparagraph
(i) of this subparagraph, including health and physical education;
(iii) Students with the opportunity to participate in enrichment activities that  contribute to a
well-rounded education, including learning opportunities that may be based on service, experience
or work and that may be provided through partnerships with other organizations; and
(iv) Teachers with the opportunity to  collaborate, plan and engage in professional development
within and across grades and subjects.
(c) Nothing in this subsection prevents a school district  or public charter school from main-
taining control over course content, format, materials and teaching methods.
(2) The State Board of Education shall continually  review and revise all adopted academic
content standards necessary for students to successfully transition to the next  phase of their edu-
cation.
Enrolled House Bill 3365 (HB 3365-B) Page 2
(3)(a) School districts and public charter schools must offer students instruction in mathematics,
science, language arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education and  career path
skills, personal financial education, physical education, health, the arts and world languages.
(b) Instruction required under paragraph (a) of this subsection must:
(A) Meet the academic content standards adopted by the State Board of Education; and
(B) Meet  the requirements adopted by the State Board of Education and the board of the school
district or public charter school.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 329.045 by  sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act apply
to all reviews and revisions  of academic content standards occurring on or after the effective
date of this 2025 Act.
Passed by House April 17, 2025
Repassed by House June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3365 (HB 3365-B) Page 3